Utah statutes.
78B-14-607.   Contest of registration or enforcement.
(1)  A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered order or
seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one or more of
the following defenses:
(a)  the issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting
party;
(b)  the order was obtained by fraud;
(c)  the order has been vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;
(d)  the issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;
(e)  there is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;
(f)  full or partial payment has been made;
(g)  the statute of limitation under Section 78B-14-604 precludes enforcement
of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or
(h)  the alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.
(2)  If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under
Subsection (1), a tribunal may stay enforcement of the registered order,
continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence,
and issue other appropriate orders.  An uncontested portion of the registered
order may be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.
(3)  If the contesting party does not establish a defense under Subsection (1)
to the validity or enforcement of the order, the registering tribunal shall
issue an order confirming the order.
